Utah statutes.
9-8-402.   State register -- Division duties.

(1)  As used in this part, "State Register" means a register of cultural sites and localities, historic and prehistoric sites, and districts, buildings, and objects significant in Utah history.

(2)  The division shall:

(a)  constitute the historic preservation agency for this state;

(b)  establish a state register for the orderly identification and recognition of the state's cultural resources; and

(c)  provide for participation in the National Historic Preservation Program.



Amended by Chapter 170, 1995 General Session

